Alaska, session 34, SB173.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 05 * Section 1. AS 36.05 is amended by adding new sections to article 1 to read: 06 Sec. 36.05.125. Use of apprentice labor in construction. (a) To the extent 07 practicable, each construction contract that the Department of Transportation and 08 Public Facilities or the Department of Administration advertises for bids that has a 09 contract award amount of $2,500,000 or more must require that not less than 15 10 percent of the labor hours on a project be performed by apprentices in the following 11 occupations: 12 (1) boilermakers; 13 (2) bricklayers; 14 (3) carpenters; 01 (4) cement masons; 02 (5) culinary workers; 03 (6) electricians; 04 (7) elevator constructors and mechanics; 05 (8) equipment operators; 06 (9) insulation workers; 07 (10) ironworkers; 08 (11) laborers; 09 (12) mechanics; 10 (13) millwrights; 11 (14) painters; 12 (15) pile driving occupations; 13 (16) plumbers and pipefitters; 14 (17) roofers; 15 (18) sheet metal workers; 16 (19) sprinkler fitters; 17 (20) surveyors; 18 (21) truck drivers; 19 (22) tugboat workers; and 20 (23) welders. 21 (b) A construction contract under (a) of this section must, to the extent 22 practicable, require that at least 20 percent of the apprentices hired be veterans. 23 (c) The commissioner of transportation and public facilities or the 24 commissioner of administration shall provide to the commissioner of labor and 25 workforce development the following information for each construction project 26 subject to (a) of this section: 27 (1) the name of the project; 28 (2) the dollar value of the project; 29 (3) the name of the prime contractor and contact information for the 30 prime contractor; 31 (4) the name of each subcontractor and contact information as 01 provided to the department by the prime contractor; 02 (5) the percentage of labor hours that will be performed by apprentices 03 and by apprentices who are veterans; 04 (6) the number of apprentices who are veterans; and 05 (7) the occupation title of each apprentice used. 06 (d) For each construction project for which the commissioner of labor and 07 workforce development receives information under (c) of this section, the 08 commissioner shall collect data on the total number of 09 (1) apprentice hours worked on the construction project; and 10 (2) veteran apprentices that were hired for the construction project. 11 (e) This section does not apply to a construction project if applying the 12 requirements of this section to the project would cause the state to lose federal 13 funding. 14 Sec. 36.05.130. Annual report to the legislature. The commissioner of labor 15 and workforce development shall, with the assistance of the commissioner of 16 administration and the commissioner of transportation and public facilities, submit a 17 report to the legislature identifying, for each construction contract in the previous year 18 subject to AS 36.05.125, the percentage of apprentice labor hours in the occupations 19 listed in AS 36.05.125 that were used and the number of veteran apprentices that were 20 hired. The commissioner of labor and workforce development shall deliver the report 21 to the senate secretary and chief clerk of the house of representatives on or before 22 February 1 of each year and shall notify the legislature that the report is available. 23 Sec. 36.05.135. Definitions. In AS 36.05.125 - 36.05.135, 24 (1) "apprentice" means an apprentice enrolled in a registered 25 apprenticeship program under 29 U.S.C. 50; 26 (2) "construction" means the process of building, altering, repairing, 27 maintaining, improving, or demolishing a public highway, structure, building, or other 28 public improvement for any kind of real property other than privately owned real 29 property leased for the use of agencies; "construction" does not include professional 30 and other services related to the planning and design required for a construction 31 project, the routine operation of a public improvement to real property, or the 01 construction of public housing; 02 (3) "labor hours" means the total hours of work performed by 03 construction workers on a project in job classes subject to minimum wage rates under 04 AS 36.05.070; 05 (4) "veteran" means an individual who 06 (A) served in the 07 (i) armed forces of the United States, including a 08 reserve unit of the United States armed forces; or 09 (ii) Alaska Territorial Guard, the Alaska Army National 10 Guard, the Alaska Air National Guard, or the Alaska Navel Militia; and 11 (B) was separated from service under a condition that was not 12 dishonorable. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.